Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB805.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7518. Sky lantern tethering.(a) Offenses defined.--A person commits an offense if the person:(1) intentionally releases a sky lantern, aerial luminary lantern or similar floating device outdoors unless the sky lantern, aerial luminary lantern or similar floating device is tethered by a weight or other fixed structure connected to the ground; or(2) tethers a sky lantern, aerial luminary lantern or similar floating device and intentionally leaves the sky lantern, aerial luminary lantern or similar floating device unattended.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) Penalties.--(1) A violation of subsection (a)(1) is a summary offense punishable by a fine of not less than $500.(2) A violation of subsection (a)(2) in which the sky lantern, aerial luminary lantern or similar floating device is released outdoors beyond the control of the person who tethered it is a summary offense punishable by a fine of not less than $1,500.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aerial luminary lantern." A sky lantern."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township."Person." As follows:(1) An individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, association, firm, estate, trust, foundation, municipality or other business or governmental entity.(2) The term does not include the Commonwealth." Sky lantern." A small hot air balloon made of paper, or similar material, with an opening at the bottom where a small fire is suspended, which causes the lantern to rise in the air.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0805PN0857 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324